Alaska, session 34, HB363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 04.09.220(d) is amended to read: 06 (d) Alcoholic beverages sold under a club license may be purchased only by 07 (1) members of the club and their families; 08 (2) widows or widowers of deceased members of the club who have 09 been accorded club privileges; 10 (3) military personnel on active duty who are extended the privilege by 11 patriotic organizations; and 12 (4) members of a patriotic organization licensed under this section 13 [THAT HAS A RECIPROCITY AGREEMENT WITH ANOTHER PATRIOTIC 14 ORGANIZATION LICENSED UNDER THIS SECTION]. 01 * Sec. 2. AS 04.09.220(i) is amended to read: 02 (i) The holder of a club license may not 03 (1) solicit public patronage of the club premises, except as approved by 04 the board or at a permitted event under AS 04.09.630, 04.09.660, or 04.09.670; 05 (2) distribute income from the sale of alcoholic beverages under the 06 license to a member, director, or officer; 07 (3) sell or serve alcoholic beverages in club rooms outside the portion 08 of the club rooms that are part of the licensed premises. 09 * Sec. 3. AS 04.09.660(a) is amended to read: 10 (a) A nonprofit organization event permit authorizes the holder to sell or 11 dispense brewed beverages or wine for consumption at an event organized by the 12 nonprofit organization, except that a holder that is a patriotic organization may 13 also sell or dispense other alcoholic beverages for consumption at an event 14 organized by the patriotic organization. 15 * Sec. 4. AS 04.09.660(e) is amended to read: 16 (e) The nonprofit organization shall ensure that all profits derived from the 17 sale of brewed beverages, [OR] wine, or other alcoholic beverages, as applicable, 18 under a nonprofit organization event permit are paid to the organization that holds the 19 permit and not to an individual. 20 * Sec. 5. AS 04.21.080(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 21 (31) "patriotic organization" includes the American Legion, Veterans 22 of Foreign Wars, and American Veterans organizations. 23 * Sec. 6. AS 04.09.220(j) is repealed. 24 * Sec. 7. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.